Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285B.551 is amended to read:
285B.551. (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, at the request  of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Oregon Business Development
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds:
(a) To provide financial and other assistance, including but not limited to loans and grants,  to
municipalities, ports and other persons and entities in accordance with the laws governing use  of
moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created  by ORS 285B.455, the Water Fund created by ORS
285B.563, the Safe Drinking Water Revolving  Loan Fund created by ORS 285A.213, the Oregon Port
Revolving Fund created by ORS 285A.708, the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund created by ORS
285A.188, the Oregon Business Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 and  the Marine Navi-
gation Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267.
(b) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project.
(c) To fund Oregon’s share  of the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the
lower Columbia River estuary designed to  improve habitat for listed endangered or threatened spe-
cies of Columbia River anadromous salmonids.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) The financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
will assist in the establishment and expansion of businesses in  Oregon and in the construction, im-
provement and expansion of infrastructure, community and port  facilities and other facilities that
comprise  the  physical foundation for industrial and commercial activity and provide the basic
framework for continued and expanded economic opportunities and quality  communities throughout
Oregon.
(b) The Columbia River channel deepening project is  necessary to allow newer, larger
steamships access to Oregon and Washington deep draft ports. A deeper shipping channel will  allow
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 1
the Columbia River to  continue as a world leader in agricultural exports and as a key trade corridor
for farms and businesses throughout Oregon and the region.
(c) Such financial  and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities
and the deepening  of the Columbia River channel will therefore promote economic development
within this state, and thus the use of net proceeds derived from the operation of  the Oregon State
Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds  issued under this section to provide such financial and
other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons and entities and  to pay a portion of the
costs of deepening the Columbia  River channel is an authorized use of state lottery funds under
section 4, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(d) The current lower Columbia River estuary habitat for listed endangered or  threatened spe-
cies  of  Columbia River anadromous salmonids could be improved through ecosystem restoration
projects. The use of the Oregon State Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds issued  under this
section to pay  for studying how the estuary could be improved and to pay for ecosystem restoration
projects are authorized uses of state lottery funds.
(3)(a) The aggregate  principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section for financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
may not  exceed the sum of [ $366,226,252] $386,226,252 and an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related costs. The aggregate principal amount of lottery
bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section for the Columbia River channel  deepening
project may not  exceed the sum of $17.7 million and an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may not request the  issuance of lottery
bonds under subsection (1)(b) of this section  until the Director of the Oregon Business Development
Department determines  that a final environmental impact statement has been issued and a record
of decisions  has been submitted to Congress by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, Con-
gress has authorized the Columbia River channel deepening project, and  the Washington sponsors’
shares of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project have been committed.
(4) The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a)  and (b) of this section
shall be deposited in the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, which is  hereby established in the
State Treasury separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund shall be credited  to the fund. All moneys in the Economic Infrastructure
Project  Fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
any purpose for which  moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created by ORS 285B.455 may be
used, any  purpose for which moneys in the Water Fund created by ORS 285B.563 may be used, any
purpose for which moneys in the Safe Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  created by ORS
285A.213 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in  the Oregon Port Revolving Fund created
by ORS 285A.708 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund created by ORS 285A.188 may be used, any purpose for  which moneys in the Oregon Business
Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 may be used and any purpose for  which moneys in the
Marine Navigation  Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267 may be used. The Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department shall allocate the moneys deposited in  the Economic
Infrastructure  Project  Fund for the purposes described in this subsection in accordance with the
priorities developed by the Oregon Business Development Commission in accordance with  ORS
285A.020. However, the director shall  transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund and
deposit into the Channel  Deepening Account of the Marine Navigation Improvement Fund the pro-
ceeds of any lottery bonds sold to finance  a portion of the costs of the Columbia River channel
deepening project. Upon determining the relative  allocation of moneys deposited in the Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund among  the purposes described in this subsection, the director shall
transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, and deposit into each  of the other funds
described in this subsection, the amounts so allocated. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law
governing the funds described in this  subsection, the funds described in this subsection may be
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 2
credited with moneys transferred from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund by the director  in
accordance with this subsection.
(5) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section for the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in  the lower Columbia River
estuary may not exceed the sum of $750,000 and an additional amount estimated by the  State
Treasurer  to  be necessary to pay bond-related costs. The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pur-
suant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be  deposited in the Oregon Business, Innovation and
Trade Fund created by ORS 285A.227 and may be  used only for the Oregon nonfederal share of
United States Army Corps of Engineers Columbia  River estuary projects authorized by Congress
prior to August 9, 2001. The director may  not request the issuance of lottery bonds under subsection
(1)(c) of  this section until Congress and Washington have authorized their respective shares of the
costs of the studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the lower Columbia River estuary.
(6) The proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to this section may be used only for the pur-
poses set forth in this section and for bond-related costs.
SECTION 2.  Section 2, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $5 million ] $10 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery  bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Oregon
Business Development  Department for deposit in the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund established
in ORS 285A.188 for the purposes described in ORS 285A.185 and 285A.188.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Redevelopment of industrial-zoned brownfields improves  the economy by returning the as-
sessed value of the properties to the real market value for property taxation purposes; and
(b) The projects made possible through increased funding to evaluate, clean up  and redevelop
brownfields properties create jobs and further economic development.
SECTION 3. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Education, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $17.5 million in net proceeds  for the pur-
poses described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Department of Education for deposit in the Connecting Oregon Schools Fund  established in
ORS 276A.424 for providing matching funds  for federal moneys received by school districts
for the purpose of providing broadband access to eligible schools in this state.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Assisting  school districts with matching funds promotes expansion of access to high
speed broadband for public education; and
(b) Providing financial assistance to school districts for building connections  to
broadband infrastructure will enhance community efforts to promote economic growth.
SECTION 4.
 Section 4, chapter  906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by section 3, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 19, chapter 786,  Oregon Laws 2013, section 15, chapter 121, Oregon Laws
2014, section 37, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, section
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 3
7, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 7, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended  to
read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, at  the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Housing and Community Services
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds for the Housing and Community
Services Department to provide financial assistance to aid in the acquisition, renovation or mainte-
nance of properties with  project-based federal rental assistance contracts, public housing undergoing
significant recapitalization or publicly supported housing as defined in  ORS 456.250, or to preserve
the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Individuals  who are at risk of homelessness or who otherwise pay a disproportionate share
of income for housing increase their potential  for self-sufficiency, and use proportionately fewer
community-funded resources when they are provided a stable housing environment.
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(3) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)  of this
section may not exceed the amount of [ $83,801,718] $58,801,718 plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 5.
 Section 3, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Water Resources De-
partment, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $25 million] $40 million in  net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to  the Water
Resources Department for deposit in the Water Supply Development Account  established in ORS
541.656, in an amount sufficient to provide:
(a) [ $15 million] $30 million in  net proceeds to issue grants or loans to evaluate, plan and de-
velop in-stream and out-of-stream statewide water development projects.
(b) $10 million in net proceeds to the Deschutes Basin Board  of Control to modernize irrigation
delivery systems infrastructure in the Deschutes Basin by piping open canals.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems en-
hances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local  governments to mitigate losses resulting from reduced water supply for irri-
gation and  retirement of water rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and promote
economic growth.
SECTION 6.
 Section 4, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Water Resources De-
partment, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $4 million ] $14 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Water
Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund, estab-
lished in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009,  for distribution to the City of Newport for
remediation of the Big Creek Dams, including  design, environmental permitting[ , planning and
design costs  for replacement of the Big Creek Dams ] and construction of a seismically sound re-
placement dam.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 4
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems en-
hances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local  governments to mitigate losses resulting from reduced water supply for irri-
gation and  retirement of water rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and promote
economic growth.
SECTION 7.  Section 5, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Water Resources De-
partment, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $14 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds  of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Water
Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund, estab-
lished in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, for distribution to the Wallowa Lake Irrigation
District for rehabilitation of the Wallowa Lake Dam.
(3) Lottery bonds authorized under this section may not be issued unless:
(a) The Wallowa Lake Irrigation District, State Department of Fish of  Wildlife, Confederated
Tribes of  the Umatilla Indian Reservation and Nez Perce Tribe enter into an agreement regarding
the protection and release of instream water from the Wallowa Lake Dam; and
(b) The Wallowa  Lake Irrigation District submits a copy of the executed agreement to the Water
Resources Department.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems en-
hances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local  governments to mitigate losses resulting from reduced water supply for irri-
gation and  retirement of water rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and promote
economic growth.
SECTION 8.
 Section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended  by section 5, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 14, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, and section 6, chapter 671,  Oregon
Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund is established separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys deposited in  the Water Resources De-
partment Water Supply  Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund are continuously
appropriated to the Water Resources Department.
(2) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund consists of:
(a) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to sections 8 and 9, chapter 906, Oregon  Laws
2009, deposited into the Water  Resources Department Water Supply Fund for the following purposes:
(A) $2,500,000 for the purposes of issuing grants to  develop Umatilla Basin critical ground water
storage projects described in section 17, chapter 907, Oregon  Laws 2009, and to provide or pay for
services in connection with those projects.
(B) $217,000 to pay for the operation of loan and grant programs under sections 18 to 27, chapter
907, Oregon Laws 2009.
(C) $283,000 for the purpose of developing an integrated state water resources  strategy to im-
plement the state water resources policy pursuant to ORS 536.220 and section 45, chapter  907,
Oregon Laws 2009.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 5
(D) $500,000 for purposes of the grant program established by section 1, chapter 13,  Oregon
Laws 2008.
(b) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to section 4, chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2011,
in an amount sufficient to provide $1,229,052 in net  proceeds and interest earnings for the depart-
ment to finance grants for feasibility studies for water conservation, reuse and storage projects.
(c) $11 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant  to section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to develop and  implement water storage systems and delivery infrastructure, implement
conservation and reuse projects or provide access to new water supplies.
(d) $750,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to  section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to provide grants for place-based planning.
(e) $1 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to  section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to repair, replace or remediate water wells in the Mosier Creek area.
(f) [ $4 million] $14 million in net proceeds pursuant to section 4 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671,
Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 6 of this 2021 Act,  for remediation of the Big Creek
Dams, including design, environmental permitting[ , planning and design  costs for replacement of the
Big Creek Dams ] and construction of a seismically sound replacement dam .
(g) $14 million in net  proceeds pursuant to section 5 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671, Oregon
Laws 2019, as amended by section 7 of this 2021 Act,  for rehabilitation of  the Wallowa Lake
Dam.
(h) Any other fees, revenues or income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 9.
 Section 10, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Oregon Coast
Aquarium, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the  depart-
ment for deposit in the ODAS Economic Development Distributions  Fund established under ORS
461.553 for  distribution to the Oregon Coast Aquarium for capital improvements to indoor galleries
at the Oregon Coast Aquarium in Newport[ , including construction of a marine wildlife rehabilitation
and education center ].
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the [ following findings: ]
[(a)] finding that providing financing to enhance the educational resources of the Oregon  Coast
Aquarium promotes learning about the coastal  environment, sustainable practices and marine sci-
ence careers[ ; and ]
[(b) Providing facilities to treat and rehabilitate stranded and endangered marine  wildlife animals
will help to protect aquatic life important to the Oregon coast ].
SECTION 10.
 Section 11, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 11.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Center for Hope and
Safety, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $2.5 million ] $7.5 million in net proceeds  for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treas-
urer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to the Center for Hope and Safety for construction of HOPE Plaza at the
site of the former Greyhound Bus Terminal in Salem, which  will include space for businesses that
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 6
provide job training and services to survivors of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking and hu-
man trafficking, as well as transitional and permanent housing for survivors.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Programs that support survivors reduce the  financial and economic burden domestic violence
imposes on individuals and the community;
(b) Providing services and job training to survivors increases their  workforce participation and
productivity;  and
(c) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
SECTION 11.
 Section 12, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 12. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the City  of Gresham, the
State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an
amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds for the purposes described  in subsection (2) of this
section, plus an  additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-
related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to the City of Gresham for expansion of the  Gradin Community Sports Park
to include additional fields and amenities.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that improving access to sports
and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of the region, create jobs and improve
the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 12.
 Section 15, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Eugene  Family YMCA,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS  286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection  (2) of
this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State  Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to the Eugene Family YMCA to construct a new YMCA facility in Eugene.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that improving access to sports
and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of the region, create jobs and improve
the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 13.
 Section 17, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 17.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Jefferson County, the State
Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount
that produces [ $4.1 million] $5.4 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2)
of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to Jefferson County for construction of the Jefferson  County Health and
Wellness Center, including associated utility, transit and parking infrastructure.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 7
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that expanding access to health
care for all members of the workforce will promote economic development.
SECTION 14.
 Section 19, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 19. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with Parrott Creek Child  and
Family Services, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount  that produces $3.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in
subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be
necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to Parrott Creek  Child and Family Services to update and renovate buildings
using trauma-informed designs to better serve high-need children and teens in the juvenile and child
welfare  systems.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is  authorized based on the finding that expanding programs and
services for at-risk youth will facilitate and encourage economic development.
SECTION 15.
 Section 20, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 20. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Port of Cascade Locks,
the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in
an amount that produces $2.4 million in net proceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2)
of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net  proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the depart-
ment for deposit in the  ODAS Economic Development Distributions Fund established under ORS
461.553 for distribution to the Port of Cascade Locks to construct buildings  and upgrade and expand
infrastructure in the Port of Cascade Locks Business Park.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based  on the finding that assisting in the establish-
ment and expansion of businesses in Oregon  and in the construction, improvement and expansion
of infrastructure that comprises  the physical foundation for industrial and commercial activities
provide the basic framework for continued and expanded economic opportunities and quality com-
munities.
SECTION 16.
 Section 33, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 33. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $15  million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery  bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the Oregon
Business Development Department for deposit in the  Levee Project Grant Fund established [ under
section 34 of this 2019 Act ] in ORS 285B.421 for the purpose of providing grants under ORS 285B.420
for levee projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 8
(a) Levees are an integral part of the commercial and industrial infrastructure of this state.
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees will  promote economic de-
velopment within this state.
SECTION 17.
 Section 37, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 37.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the Department  of Trans-
portation, the State Treasurer  is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $2 million ] $4 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  under this section must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Transportation for deposit in the DOT Economic  Development Distributions Fund estab-
lished in ORS 461.557 for distribution to the City of Sherwood for [ pedestrian connection
improvements between Sherwood East and West at or near the ] a pedestrian bridge across  State
Highway 99W [ and] at Sunset Boulevard [ intersection].
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish  and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding that a safe, efficient and reliable
pedestrian and bicycle  transportation network supports the long-term economic development and
livability of this state.
SECTION 18.  Section 39, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 39. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Department of
Veterans’ Affairs, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $4 million ] $6 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State Treas-
urer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  under this section must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Veterans’ Affairs for deposit in the Veterans’ Affordable  Housing Fund, established in sec-
tion 40 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019 , for distribution to [ the YMCA of  Marion
and Polk Counties ] Salem Y Veterans Housing  to  construct veterans’ affordable housing in Salem.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists in Oregon, and market  indicators demonstrate
a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 19.
 Section 40, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 40. (1) The Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund is established in the State  Treasury, sepa-
rate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund
must be credited to the fund. The  Veterans’ Affordable Housing Fund consists of moneys deposited
in the fund under section 39 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter  671, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by
section 18 of this 2021 Act,  and may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or trans-
ferred to the fund  by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the
fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Veterans’ Affairs for
disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 39 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 671, Oregon Laws
2019, as amended by section 18 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 20.  Section 41, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 41. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, [ 2019] 2021, at the request of the Oregon  De-
partment of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the State Parks and Re-
creation Department, the State Treasurer may issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560 to
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 9
286A.585 in an amount that produces [ $5 million ] $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2)  of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred  to the State
Parks and Recreation Department for  deposit into the Oregon Main Street Revitalization Grant
Program Fund established in ORS 390.264 to provide grants pursuant to ORS 390.262.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the  use of proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to
this section will create jobs, further economic development and enhance the economic vitality  of
Oregon downtowns and local communities by supporting projects that revitalize  historic downtown
commercial districts, redevelop and reuse existing  buildings, facilitate small business relocation and
expansion initiatives and provide assistance, training and technical services.
SECTION 21. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with Klamath County,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $12 million in net proceeds for the purposes  described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553  for distribution to Klamath County for construction of the Klamath
Crimson Rose residential treatment facility in Klamath Falls.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding programs  and services for at-risk youth will facilitate and encourage economic
development.
SECTION 22. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with Latino Network,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for  the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Latino Network for  construction of La Plaza Esperanza
in east Multnomah County.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to preschool programs and community services will  enhance the economic
viability of the region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 23. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Willamette Ed-
ucation Service District, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $6,921,150 in net proceeds  for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Willamette Education Service District for  renovating
and equipping the Willamette Career Academy facility in Salem.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 10
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to technical education for Oregonians entering the workforce will facilitate
and encourage economic development.
SECTION 24.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Eugene, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553  for distribution to the City of Eugene for development of the Eugene
Downtown Riverfront Park.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
developing an accessible riverfront park will enhance the economic viability of the region
through increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 25.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Woodburn, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the City of Woodburn for construction of a community
center in Woodburn.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to community services will enhance  the economic viability of the region,
create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 26. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with Rogue  River
School District, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Rogue River  School District to build the Rogue River
Wimer Wellness Center, which will include health and early learning services.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Expanding access to health and mental health care for all members of the  workforce
will promote economic development.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 11
(b) Early education is a necessary component  of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 27. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with East Lincoln
County Fire and  Rescue District, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $4 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS  461.553 for distribution to East Lincoln County Fire and Rescue District for con-
struction of the Eddyville Fire Hall.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency services are necessary components  of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 28. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Greater
Toledo Pool Recreation District, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Greater Toledo Pool Recreation District  for reno-
vations and construction of the Greater Toledo Aquatic and Community Center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to recreation services  will enhance the economic viability of the region,
create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 29. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Multnomah
County, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Multnomah County for renovation and  construction of
the Behavioral Health Resource Center in downtown Portland.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
access to supportive services and housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s
healthy economic growth.
SECTION 30.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of North
Plains, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 12
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the City of North Plains for construction of a public
works and emergency operations facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
public works  and emergency services are necessary components for continued and expanded
economic opportunities and quality communities.
SECTION 31. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of John
Day, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $2 million in net proceeds for  the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the City of John Day for construction of an  aquatics
center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to recreation services will enhance the economic  viability of the region,
create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 32. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Family Jus-
tice Center of Washington County, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $6.25  million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for  distribution to the Family Justice Center of Washington County for
acquisition and renovation of a building to establish the Washington County Family Peace
Center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
programs that support children and families  impacted by child abuse, neglect and domestic
violence reduce the financial and economic burden domestic violence and  child abuse impose
on individuals and the community.
SECTION 33.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Corvallis
Homeless Shelter Coalition, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursu-
ant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 13
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to  the Corvallis Homeless Shelter Coalition for develop-
ment of permanent supportive housing at the site of the former Budget Inn in Corvallis.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
access to supportive services and housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s
healthy economic growth.
SECTION 34. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Wasco County,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.5 million in net  proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to Wasco County for construction of the Columbia Gorge
Resolution Center residential treatment facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
individuals increase their potential for self-sufficiency, increase  economic productivity and
use fewer public resources when they have access to mental health and addiction treatment
programs and services.
SECTION 35.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Port of
Portland, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Port  of Portland for engineering and design of a
seismically resilient runway at Portland International Airport.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
port facilities are part of the physical  foundation for industrial and commercial activities in
this state and that resilient infrastructure will mitigate business interruptions and  economic
losses after a seismic event.
SECTION 36. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Willamette
Falls Locks Authority, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $7.25 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Willamette Falls Locks Authority for  restoration
of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 14
restoration of  the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks will enhance the economic
viability of the  region, increase opportunities for commercial transportation and offer op-
portunities for recreation and transportation.
SECTION 37. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Phoenix, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $13.6 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to City of Phoenix for construction of  the Government
and Public Safety Center to replace the Phoenix Fire Station and existing City Hall and Police
Station buildings.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency services are necessary components of a climate  that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 38.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Mid-
Willamette Family YMCA, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant
to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4,578,144 in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for  distribution to the Mid-Willamette Family YMCA for construction of
a multi-purpose sports field complex.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to sports and recreation services will enhance the economic viability of  the
region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 39. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Serendipity
Center, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2.8 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the  Serendipity Center for construction of an addition
on the school campus that will include classrooms, spaces for  physical movement, and
counseling.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding therapeutic education programs and services for at-risk youth will  facilitate and
encourage economic development.
SECTION 40.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Oregon Mu-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 15
seum of Science and Industry, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pur-
suant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Oregon Museum of Science  and Industry for de-
velopment and construction of a New Water Avenue within the OMSI District.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
development of the OMSI District will enhance the  economic viability of the region through
increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 41. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Lincoln City, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $2.5 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the City of Lincoln City to construct a  welcome center,
upgrade restrooms, landscaping, and improve beach access at D River State  Wayside in
Lincoln City.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improvements to D River State Wayside will enhance the economic viability  of the region
through increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 42. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Port of
Morrow, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.3 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the Port of Morrow to construct a community  center
that will provide space for workforce development at the SAGE Center in Boardman.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
workforce and small business development will lead to enhanced economic development.
SECTION 43.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Redmond, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 16
under ORS 461.553 for distribution to the City of Redmond for construction of a public  safety
facility that includes space for colocated mental health triage services.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
public safety facilities and mental health services are necessary  components of a climate
that facilitates and encourages economic development.
SECTION 44. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $9,149,378 in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic
Fund established in section 6, chapter  786, Oregon Laws 2013, to provide the following grants:
(a) $750,000 to the Maxville Heritage Interpretive Center  for preservation of the historic
Maxville Townsite in Wallowa County.
(b) $2,000,000 to Artists Repertory Theatre for ArtsHub  and creation of a modern multi-
use performing arts center in Portland.
(c) $600,000 to the Josephy Center for Arts and Culture for renovation and  expansion of
the center in Wallowa County.
(d) $295,000  to the Eastern Oregon Regional Theatre for restoration of the Baker
Orpheum Theatre.
(e) $1,250,000 to the Chehalem Cultural Center  for renovation and construction of a per-
forming arts wing.
(f) $750,000 to the Siltez Tribal  Arts and Heritage Society for construction of the A Place
for the People cultural heritage center.
(g) $1,600,000 to The Jon G. Shedd Institute for the Arts to remodel the north  entrance
of the Shedd Institute in Eugene.
(h) $600,000 to the Little  Theatre on the Bay to expand and enhance the Liberty Theatre.
(i) $304,378 to the Columbia River Maritime Museum for preservation  of the historic
Lightship Columbia.
(j) $1,000,000 to the Portland Art Museum for the Rothko Pavilion that will  connect the
museum’s two historic buildings.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The grants described in this section will leverage art and cultural resources to create
vibrant public spaces that integrate art and cultural and natural amenities, sustain  Oregon’s
rich arts and cultural experiences and enhance a  strong sense of place and community
identity.
(b) The factors described in paragraph (a) of this subsection have the  effect of creating
jobs, expanding business and tax revenues and enhancing the  economic vitality of Oregon
communities.
SECTION 45.
 Section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, as  amended by section 27, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 23, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and section 36, chapter 671, Oregon
Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Cultural Resources Economic  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund.  Interest earned on the moneys in the Cultural Resources Eco-
nomic Fund shall be  credited to the fund. The Cultural Resources Economic Fund consists of moneys
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 17
deposited in the fund under section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, section  26, chapter 812,
Oregon  Laws  2015, section 22, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and [ section 35 of this 2019 Act ]
section 44 of this 2021 Act  and may include fees, revenues or other  income deposited in the fund
by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 5, chapter  786, Oregon Laws 2013,
and section 26, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 22,  chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, and
[section 35 of this 2019 Act ] section 44 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 46. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the County Fair Capital  Improve-
ment Fund established under section 47 of this 2021 Act  for the purpose of providing grants
for capital improvements to county fair facilities.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
county fairs and fairground activities enhance  the economic viability of the region through
increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 47. (1) The County Fair Capital Improvement Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the County Fair
Capital Improvement Fund must be credited to the fund. The County Fair Capital Improve-
ment Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under section 46 of  this 2021 Act and
may include moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred  to the fund by the
Legislative Assembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Develop-
ment Department for disbursement for the purposes set forth in section 46 of this 2021  Act.
SECTION 48.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $2.1 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established in ORS 461.557 for distribution to the Tualatin Hills  Parks and Recreation
District for improvements to the Fanno Creek Regional Trail.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving park and recreation facilities will enhance the economic  viability of the region
through increased tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 49. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Health Authority, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 18
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Health Authority for deposit in the Behavioral Health  Housing Incentive Fund es-
tablished in section 1, chapter , Oregon Laws 2021 (Enrolled House Bill 2316), for the
purposes described in ORS 458.385.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Individuals who have mental illnesses  or addiction disorders increase their potential
for self-sufficiency and use fewer public resources when they have access to safe,  affordable
rental housing.
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is  essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth.
SECTION 50. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Housing and
Community Services Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $30 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Housing and Community Services  Department for deposit in the Wildfire Recovery Housing
Fund established under section 52 of this 2021  Act for the purpose of providing financial as-
sistance to increase interim housing supply for people displaced by the 2020 wildfires.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
supporting stable housing for people displaced by  wildfires will promote economic recovery
and job creation in areas affected by wildfires.
SECTION 51. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, at  the request of the Oregon
Department Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Housing and
Community Services Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Housing and Community Services Department for deposit in the  Wildfire Recovery Housing
Fund established under section 52 of this 2021 Act for the purpose of providing loans to
purchasers of land to develop housing for people displaced by the 2020 wildfires.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
supporting stable housing for people displaced  by wildfires will promote economic recovery
and job creation in areas affected by wildfires.
SECTION 52.
(1) The Wildfire Recovery Housing Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from  the General Fund. Interest earned by the Wildfire Recovery
Housing Fund must be credited to the  fund. The Wildfire Recovery Housing Fund consists
of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 50 and 51 of this  2021 Act and may include
moneys appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the fund by the Legislative As-
sembly or otherwise and interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously  appropriated to the Housing and Community
Services Department for disbursement for the  purposes set forth in sections 50 and 51 of this
2021 Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 19
SECTION 53.  Section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended  by section 32, chapter
671, Oregon  Laws 2019, and section 13, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), is
amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development Distributions  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Economic Development Distributions Fund must be credited to the fund. The OBDD Economic  De-
velopment Distributions Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26  and 27,
chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, [ and sections 27 and 31, chapter  671, Oregon Laws 2019, ] and may
include fees, revenues or other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for  purposes described in sections 26 and 27, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017[ , and sections
27 and 31, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019 ].
SECTION 54.
 Section 13, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, as  amended by section 1, chapter 900,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 1, chapter 754, Oregon  Laws 2013, section 3, chapter 815, Oregon Laws
2015, and section 42, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 13.  (1) In addition to amounts authorized under ORS 286.505 to  286.545 (2005 Edition) or
pursuant to ORS 286A.035, the  State Treasurer, at the request of the Director of the Oregon Busi-
ness Development Department, may issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585:
(a) In an amount of up to [ $60] $5 million  for payment of the expenses of the Coos Bay Channel
Project [ in increments described in subsection (2) of this section ]; and
(b) In  an additional amount to be estimated by the State Treasurer for payment of bond-related
costs of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, the Oregon Business  Development De-
partment and the State Treasurer.
(2) The director  shall request that the State Treasurer issue the amount of bonds described in
subsection (1)(a) of this section [ in increments that allow the director ], at the request of  the primary
sponsor, to transfer[ :]
[(a)] in the biennium beginning July 1, 2007, up to $5 million in net proceeds  of lottery bonds
to the Coos Bay Channel Fund established in section 15, chapter 746, Oregon  Laws 2007, for dis-
tribution to the primary sponsor after the  director finds that the primary sponsor has taken action
pursuant to the grant agreement required in section 14, chapter 746, Oregon  Laws 2007, that trig-
gers the distribution of bond proceeds described in this paragraph.
[(b) In the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, up to $15  million in net proceeds of lottery bonds,
minus any other state funds secured by the primary sponsor in the interim period 2015 to 2016, to  the
Coos Bay Channel Fund established in  section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for distribution to
the primary sponsor after the director finds that the primary sponsor has taken action  pursuant to the
grant agreement  required in section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, that triggers the distribution
of bond proceeds described in this paragraph. ]
[(c) In the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, up to $40 million in net proceeds of lottery  bonds to
the Coos Bay Channel Fund  established in section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for distribution
to the primary sponsor  after the director finds that the primary sponsor has taken action pursuant to
the grant agreement required in section 14, chapter  746, Oregon Laws 2007, that triggers the distrib-
ution of bond proceeds described in this paragraph. ]
SECTION 55. Section 14, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, as  amended by section 2, chapter 900,
Oregon Laws 2009, section 2, chapter 754, Oregon  Laws 2013, section 4, chapter 815, Oregon Laws
2015, section 14, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, and section 43, chapter 671, Oregon  Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
Sec. 14.  (1) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department shall enter into one
or more grant agreements with the primary sponsor that require the Oregon Business  Development
Department to disburse, over  the course of the project, an aggregate principal amount of [ $60] $5
million for payment of the expenses of the Coos Bay Channel  Project, [ in the increments described
in section 13 (2), chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, ] from the Coos Bay Channel  Fund established pur-
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 20
suant to section  15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, to the primary sponsor. The department shall
make disbursements from the fund as soon as bond proceeds are deposited in the fund.
(2) The one or more grant agreements must[ , subject to subsection  (3) of this section, ] establish
appropriate triggers for the [ incremental biennial ] distribution of bond  proceeds described in section
13 (2), chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, based on  appropriate measures of progress in completion of
the project that are satisfactory  to the director and consistent with prudent financial practices that
reflect sound stewardship of public resources.
[(3)(a) Prior to the distribution of the bond proceeds described in section 13 (2)(b), chapter  746,
Oregon Laws 2007, the primary sponsor shall provide  to the director a budget document outlining ex-
penditures for the Coos  Bay Channel Project and shall verify and certify to the director that the pri-
mary sponsor has prepared and submitted  to the United States Army Corps of Engineers the tentatively
selected plan report identifying the preferred alternative for the project. ]
[(b) Prior to the distribution of the bond  proceeds described in section 13 (2)(c), chapter 746,
Oregon Laws 2007, the primary sponsor shall provide to  the director a budget document outlining ex-
penditures for the Coos Bay Channel Project and verify and certify to the director that: ]
[(A) The final environmental impact statement and the draft record of decision have been issued
in accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq.); ]
[(B) The Oregon International  Port of Coos Bay has prepared and submitted to the United States
Army Corps of Engineers a draft combined report pursuant to section 204 of the Water Resources De-
velopment Act of 1986 (P.L. 99-662) and section 14 of  the Rivers and Harbors Appropriation Act of
1899 (33 U.S.C. 408) for technical agency review; ]
[(C) The Commander, Northwestern Division, for the United States  Army Corps of Engineers has
approved the project pursuant to section 14 of the Rivers and Harbors Appropriation Act of 1899; ]
[(D) The United States Army Corps of Engineers  Portland District has issued permits for con-
struction pursuant to section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control  Act (P.L. 92-500), as amended,
and section 10 of the Rivers and Harbors Appropriation Act of 1899; and ]
[(E) The Assistant Secretary of the Army (Civil Works) for the United States Army Corps  of En-
gineers has approved and executed an agreement pursuant to section  204(f) of the Water Resources
Development Act of 1986. ]
[(4)] (3)  The State of Oregon and its agencies and departments are not liable to the lenders,
vendors or contractors of the Oregon sponsors for any action or omission under sections 11 to 15,
chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007.
[(5)] (4) By receipt of any part of net proceeds of lottery bonds described in  section 13, chapter
746, Oregon Laws 2007, the  primary sponsor agrees to indemnify the state and its agencies and de-
partments to  the fullest extent permitted by law for liability the state or its agencies and depart-
ments might incur in connection with any borrowing by the primary sponsor for the project.
[(6)] (5) The director and the  primary sponsor shall modify the existing grant agreement as may
be necessary to incorporate the amendments to  this section and section 13, chapter 746, Oregon
Laws 2007, by sections 1 and 2, chapter 754, Oregon Laws 2013.
SECTION 56.
(1) Sections 8, 13, 18, 22, 25, 26, 27, 31 and 35, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019,
are repealed.
(2) Section 24, chapter  671, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 9, chapter 5, Oregon
Laws 2020 (second special session), is repealed.
SECTION 57. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 21
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5534 (SB 5534-A) Page 22